Utah statutes.
9-7-302.   Public access -- Rules.

(1)  The public shall have access to the State Law Library.

(2)  The board of control may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, and not inconsistent with the provisions of this part.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

